Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.130

Regents—Treasurer of board—Bond—Disbursement of funds by.

The board of regents shall appoint a treasurer who shall be the financial officer of the board and who shall hold office during the pleasure of the board. The treasurer shall render a true and faithful account of all moneys received and paid out by him or her, and shall give bond for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office in such amount as the regents require: PROVIDED, That the university shall pay the fee for such bond.

The treasurer shall make disbursements of the funds in his or her hands on the order of the board, which order shall be countersigned by the secretary of the board, and shall state on what account the disbursement is made.

[ 2011 c 336 s 722; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.130. Prior: (i) 1955 c 346 s 1, part; 1909 c 97 p 246 s 6, part; RRS s 4577, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.110, part. (ii) 1909 c 97 p 246 s 7, part; RRS s 4578, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 196, part; 1891 c 145 s 7, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.120, part. (iii) 1909 c 97 p 249 s 16, part; RRS s 4596, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 205, part; 1891 c 145 s 19, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.160, part.]